Arkansas, session 2025, SB121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-7-106 is amended to read as follows:
17-7-106. Exemptions.
(a) This chapter does not apply to licensure or certification of:
(1) Medical Except as provided in subsection (c) of this
section, medical professions under Title 17, Subtitle 3;
(2) Legal professionals; or
(3) Individuals under reciprocity agreements.
(b) This chapter does not apply to an existing multistate or
interstate compact if the chapter would result in a nullification of the
multistate or interstate compact.
(c) This chapter applies to physician assistants licensed under § 17-
105-101 et seq.
*JMB270*
04-07-2025 16:40:20 JMB270

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB121

/s/C. Penzo


































04-07-2025 16:40:20 JMB270